Hawaii statutes.
[§333F-8.7] Confidentiality of
records. (a) All certificates, applications, records, and reports made
for the purposes of this chapter that are maintained, used, or disclosed by
health care providers as defined in chapter 334, health plans as defined in
title 45 Code of Federal Regulations section 160.103, and health care
clearinghouses as defined in title 45 Code of Federal Regulations section
160.103, and directly or indirectly identifying a person who receives services
because of a developmental disability shall be kept confidential and shall not
be disclosed by any person except as allowed by
title 45 Code of Federal Regulations part 164, subpart E.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude the
application of more restrictive rules of confidentiality set forth for records
covered by title 42 Code of Federal Regulations part 2, relating to the
confidentiality of alcohol and drug abuse patient records, or disclosure deemed
necessary under the federal Developmental Disabilities Act of 1984, P.L. 98-527,
to protect and advocate for the rights of persons with developmental
disabilities who reside in facilities for persons with developmental
disabilities. [L 2014, c 214, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next